Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 4. Alaska Intrastate Mutual Aid System.

Sec. 26.23.500.
Alaska intrastate mutual aid system established.

The Alaska intrastate mutual aid system is established to provide for mutual assistance among participating political subdivisions of the state in preparing for and responding to a disaster. Except as provided in (b) of this section, all political subdivisions of the state shall participate in the system.

A political subdivision may withdraw from participation in the Alaska intrastate mutual aid system established in (a) of this section. To withdraw, the governing board of a political subdivision shall adopt a resolution declaring that the political subdivision elects not to participate in the system and provide a copy of the resolution to the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management. A political subdivision that withdraws may later elect to participate by adopting a resolution declaring the election of the political subdivision to participate and by delivering a copy of the resolution to the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management.

The provisions in AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

may not be construed to affect other mutual aid systems or agreements authorized elsewhere by law, do not prohibit a participating political subdivision from entering into other agreements with another political subdivision, including agreements entered into under AS

26.23.070

—

26.23.077

,

26.23.180

, AS

46.04.200

, or

46.04.210

, and do not affect any other agreement to which a political subdivision may be a party now or in the future.

The provisions of AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

may not be interpreted to preclude the eligibility of a political subdivision for state or federal disaster funding or disaster readiness funding.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.510.
Requests for assistance from another political subdivision.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a political subdivision of the state that is a participating political subdivision under AS

26.23.500(a)

may request and receive assistance from another participating political subdivision for

response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to a local disaster emergency declared under AS

26.23.140

;

response to a disaster emergency declared by the governor under AS

26.23.020

;

disaster prevention training exercises conducted under AS

26.23.150

; or

other drills or exercises conducted in preparation for a disaster.

The principal executive officer or an authorized designee of the principal executive officer of a participating political subdivision that is requesting assistance shall request assistance directly from the principal executive officer or authorized designee of the principal executive officer of another participating political subdivision. Requests may be made orally or in writing and shall be reported directly to the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management as soon as is practicable. A request for assistance that is made orally must be confirmed in writing within 30 days after the date of the initial oral request.

A responding political subdivision shall have sole discretion to withhold or withdraw requested assistance to provide reasonable protection and services within its own territorial limits.

Consistent with guidelines and procedures developed by the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management under AS

26.23.040(e)

, a responding political subdivision shall document all assistance that is being provided to a requesting political subdivision at the time the assistance is provided and deliver copies of the documentation to the political subdivision that requested assistance within 30 days after the assistance is provided.

The political subdivision requesting assistance shall have sole operational control over assistance provided under AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

. This subsection does not prohibit a responding political subdivision from withdrawing assistance.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.515.
Qualifications of emergency responders.

An emergency responder holding a license, certificate, or other permit issued by a state agency or a political subdivision of the state evidencing the responder’s qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill shall be considered to be licensed, certified, or permitted in the requesting political subdivision during the emergency, disaster, drill, or exercise, subject to limitations and conditions prescribed by the principal executive officer of the requesting political subdivision in writing.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.520.
Emergency responder not an employee of a requesting political subdivision.

An emergency responder from a political subdivision that responds to a political subdivision requesting assistance is not an employee of the political subdivision requesting assistance and is not entitled to any right, privilege, or benefit of employment from the requesting political subdivision, including compensation, wages, salary, leave, pension, health, or another benefit.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.525.
Workers’ compensation and benefits following injury to or death of emergency responder.

An emergency responder that is responding to and rendering assistance in a political subdivision that has requested assistance under AS

26.23.510

who sustains an injury or dies in the course of providing assistance to the requesting political subdivision under AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

is entitled to receive only the benefits otherwise authorized by law for an injury sustained, or a death that occurs, in the course of employment with, or while providing services to, the responding political subdivision. This section does not affect the right of a person to receive benefits to which the person would otherwise be entitled under any law, nor does it affect entitlement to any other benefits or compensation authorized by state or federal law.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.530.
Reimbursement for assistance provided and disputes relating to reimbursement.

A political subdivision that has received assistance from another political subdivision under AS

26.23.510

shall reimburse the political subdivision that provided assistance for the true and full value of the assistance provided. Requests for reimbursement shall be made in accordance with procedures and guidelines developed by the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management under AS

26.23.040(e)

. However, if authorized by law, a responding political subdivision may donate its assistance provided under AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

to a requesting political subdivision.

If a dispute regarding reimbursement arises between political subdivisions, the political subdivision asserting the dispute shall provide written notice to the other political subdivision identifying the reimbursement issues in dispute. If the dispute is not resolved within 90 days after receipt of the dispute notice by the political subdivision asserting the dispute, either party to the dispute may request arbitration under AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

(Revised Uniform Arbitration Act) by giving written notice to the other party. Costs of the arbitration, including compensation for the arbitrator’s services, must be borne equally by the political subdivisions participating in the arbitration, and each political subdivision shall bear its own costs and expenses, including legal fees and witness expenses, in connection with the arbitration proceeding.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.540.
Tort liability of participating political subdivisions and emergency responders.

For purposes of liability, all persons responding under the operational control of the requesting political subdivision shall be considered to be agents of the requesting political subdivision. An action for damages for an act or omission may not be brought against a responding political subdivision, or an officer or employee of a responding political subdivision, in providing assistance under AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

. This section does not preclude liability for civil damages that are the result of gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Sec. 26.23.549.
Definitions.

In AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

,

“assistance” means emergency responders and resources provided by a responding political subdivision in response to a request from a requesting political subdivision;

“emergency responder” means an employee of a responding political subdivision or of a contractor under contract with a responding political subdivision or a member of a volunteer fire department registered with the state fire marshal that provides services to the responding political subdivision, who is designated in writing by that responding political subdivision as possessing skills, qualifications, training, knowledge, or experience that may be needed, under a request for assistance under AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

, for

response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to a disaster; or

participation in drills or exercises in preparation for a disaster;

“operational control”

means the limited authority to direct tasks, assignments, and use of assistance provided pursuant to a request for assistance under AS

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

for

response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to a disaster; or

participation in drills or exercises in preparation for a disaster;

does not include medical protocols or standard operating procedures observed in the responding political subdivision, or any right, privilege, or benefit of ownership or employment, including disposition, compensation, wages, salary, pensions, health benefits, leave, seniority, discipline, promotion, hiring, or firing;

“resources” means supplies, materials, equipment, facilities, energy, services, information systems, and other assets, except for emergency responders, that may be needed, under a request for assistance from a political subdivision, for

response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to a disaster; or

participation in drills or exercises in preparation for a disaster;

“state agency” has the meaning given in AS

37.05.990

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 67 SLA 2012)